Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,171
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Foreign corporation; amended certificate of authority.

(1) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

(a) Its corporate name;

(b) The period of its duration; or

(c) The state or country of its incorporation.

(2) The requirements of section 21-20,170 for obtaining an original certificate of authority shall apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 171.